incubator/apertium-eng-lvs/apertium-eng-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="tīr/s__adj_sint">
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ais</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>am</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajam</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ais</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>us</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>os</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iem</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajiem</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>os</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajos</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ai</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajai</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ām</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajām</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajās</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āks</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākais</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āku</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āko</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āka</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākam</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākajam</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākajā</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākais</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āko</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āki</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākie</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākus</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākos</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āku</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āko</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ākiem</l><r>s<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="brīvprātīgs"><i>brīvprātīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="drošs"><i>droš</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="klīnisks"><i>klīnisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="nacionāls"><i>nacionāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="nepilngadīgs"><i>nepilngadīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="pilns"><i>piln</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="saimniecisks"><i>saimniecisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="tematisks"><i>tematisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="zems"><i>zem</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="agresīvs"><i>agresīv</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="amorāls"><i>amorāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="atjautīgs"><i>atjautīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="aukstasinīgs"><i>aukstasinīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="bezjēdzīgs"><i>bezjēdzīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="burtisks"><i>burtisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="daudzkrāsains"><i>daudzkrāsain</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="dokumentārs"><i>dokumentār</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="dāsns"><i>dāsn</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstremāls"><i>ekstremāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="fanātisks"><i>fanātisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="garlaicīgs"><i>garlaicīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="gļēvs"><i>gļēv</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="ideālistisks"><i>ideālistisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="alegorisks"><i>alegorisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="individuālistisks"><i>individuālistisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="izlēmīgs"><i>izlēmīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="karstumizturīgs"><i>karstumizturīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="kails"><i>kail</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="kluss"><i>klus</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="konspiratīvs"><i>konspiratīv</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="kristīgs"><i>kristīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="labdarīgs"><i>labdarīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="neatraktīvs"><i>neatraktīv</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="neefektīvs"><i>neefektīv</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="neierasts"><i>neierast</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="nekorumpēts"><i>nekorumpēt</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="lepns"><i>lepn</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="lirisks"><i>lirisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="līmenisks"><i>līmenisk</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="meitenīgs"><i>meitenīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="muzikāls"><i>muzikāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="noderīgs"><i>noderīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="optimāls"><i>optimāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="patriarhāls"><i>patriarhāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="pinkains"><i>pinkain</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="populārs"><i>populār</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="profesionāls"><i>profesionāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="pēkšņs"><i>pēkšņ</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="resns"><i>resn</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="rupjgraudains"><i>rupjgraudain</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="seksuāls"><i>seksuāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="skaudrs"><i>skaudr</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="sociāls"><i>sociāl</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="stiprs"><i>stipr</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="sūnains"><i>sūnain</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="totalitārs"><i>totalitār</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="tuvredzīgs"><i>tuvredzīg</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="veldrains"><i>veldrain</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="zaļgans"><i>zaļgan</i><par n="tīr/s__adj_sint"/></e>
